Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 3. General Provisions.

Sec. 06.40.160.
Consequences of violations.

A lender who, in the making of any contract, loan, or premium finance agreement or the collection of interest or charges, does any act that violates AS

06.40.010

—

06.40.020

,

06.40.090

, or

06.40.110

—

06.40.130

shall at the option of the commissioner reimburse that portion of the interest and charges in excess of that provided in those sections, or, in the case of repeated violations of those sections by the lender, the lender shall adjust the contract, loan, or premium finance agreement interest and other charges down to the contract interest limitation specified in AS

45.45.010(a)

.

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 170 SLA 1978; am § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Sec. 06.40.170.
Filing not required to perfect validity of agreement.

A filing under AS 45.29 of the premium finance agreement is not necessary to perfect the validity of the agreement as a secured transaction against creditors, subsequent purchasers, pledgees, encumbrancers, successors, or assigns.

History.

(§ 1 ch 170 SLA 1978)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS 45.29” was substituted for “AS 45.09” in accordance with § 35, ch. 113, SLA 2000.

Sec. 06.40.180.
Regulations, orders.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations necessary to carry out this chapter, and the commissioner may order any person to cease violation of this chapter or a regulation adopted under it.

History.

(§ 1 ch 170 SLA 1978)

Administrative Code. —

For license applications, see 3 AAC 7, art. 1.

For operations, see 3 AAC 7, art. 2.

For advertising, see 3 AAC 7, art. 3.

For loans, payments, and refunds, see 3 AAC 7, art. 4.

Sec. 06.40.190.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development or a designee of the commissioner;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

“premium finance agreement” means an agreement by which a borrower or prospective borrower promises to pay to a licensee or to its assignee the amount advanced or to be advanced under the agreement to an insurer or to an insurance agent or broker in payment of premiums on an insurance policy sold in this state or covering risks located in this state together with a service charge, and as a security for it the premium finance company receives an assignment of the unearned premium; however, a mortgage, conditional sale contract, or other security agreement covering property which authorizes the lienholder to pay or advance premiums for insurance under the mortgage, contract, or other security agreement is not considered to be a premium finance agreement;

“premium finance company” means a person engaged in the business of entering into premium finance agreements with borrowers or of acquiring premium finance agreements from insurance agents, brokers or other premium finance companies.

History.

(§ 1 ch 170 SLA 1978)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” and “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development” in paragraph (1) and “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in paragraph (2), in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.